District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.07

Appropriations for advertising and publication of notices.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 509, Pub. L. 93-140, § 25 (d)
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(a), 32 DCR 7396

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1112.
1973 Ed., § 1-809a.